Tennessee, session 114, SB0976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1513, is amended by deleting
the language "vapor products" and substituting instead "vapor products, smokeless nicotine
products, and other alternative nicotine products".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0976
000948
- 1 -